Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202616-1034
Retirement committee; established; city council; responsibilities; powers and duties; allocation.

(1) A retirement committee shall be established to supervise the general operation of the retirement system. The city council shall be responsible for the general administration of such retirement system unless specific functions or all functions with regard to the administration of the retirement system are delegated, by ordinance, to the retirement committee. All costs incurred with regard to the administration of the retirement system shall be paid by the city from the unallocated employer account as provided in section 16-1036.01.

(2) The city and retirement committee shall have all powers which are necessary for or appropriate to establishing, maintaining, managing, and administering the retirement system. Whenever the Cities of the First Class Firefighters Retirement Act fails to address the allocation of duties or powers in the administration of the retirement system, such powers or duties shall be vested in the city unless such powers or duties have been delegated by ordinance to the retirement committee.

Laws 1983, LB 531, § 15;

Laws 1992, LB 672, § 25;

Laws 1993, LB 724, § 11;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 207;

Laws 2024, LB686, § 8.